California, session 20252026, AB2346.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12810.1 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:12810.1. Notwithstanding subdivision (f) of Section 12810, a violation point count shall not be given for a conviction of a violation of Section 22352.1.SEC. 2. Section 21214.8 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:21214.8. (a) A local authority may, by ordinance, set a speed limit on a bicycle path of 15 or 20 miles per hour, or 10 miles per hour in limited areas with high pedestrian volumes or sign sight distance challenges, subject to subdivision (c).(b) A local authority may, by ordinance, set a speed limit on a multiuse trail of 15 or 20 miles per hour, or 10 miles per hour in limited areas with high pedestrian volumes or sign sight distance challenges, subject to subdivision (c).(c) A local authority that sets a speed limit pursuant to this section shall place appropriate signs that indicate the limits of the restricted zone and the applicable speed limit within 400 feet of each end of the restricted zone.(d) Any speed limit on a bicycle path or multiuse trail established prior to January 1, 2027, shall remain in effect.SEC. 3.Section 21214.9 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:21214.9.(a)A person under 16 years of age shall not ride an electric bicycle at a speed greater than 15 miles per hour on a highway or a bicycle path.(b)A peace officer shall only issue warning citations until December 31, 2027.SEC. 4.SEC. 3. Section 22352.1 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:22352.1. (a) In addition to the prima facie speed limits imposed by Section 22352, the prima facie speed limit for a sidewalk, as defined in Section 555, is 10 miles per hour and shall be applicable as authorized in this code and, if so changed, only when signs have been erected giving notice thereof.(b) A conviction of a violation of this section shall not result in a violation point count pursuant to Section 12810.1.SEC. 5.SEC. 4. Article 19 (commencing with Section 28170) is added to Chapter 5 of Division 12 of the Vehicle Code, to read: Article 19. Electric Bicycles28170. (a) Manufacturers and distributors of electric bicycles shall apply a label that is permanently affixed, in a prominent location, to each electric bicycle. The label shall contain the classification number, top assisted speed, and motor wattage of the electric bicycle, and shall be printed in Arial font in at least 9-point type.(b) (1) Sellers and distributors of electric bicycles shall disclose, in writing, all of the following information at or before the point of sale of each electric bicycle:(A) The classification of the electric bicycle.(B) The maximum speed of the electric bicycle.(C) The continuous and peak wattage of the electric bicycle.(D) Any age restrictions on the use of the electric bicycle.(E) The helmet requirements for an electric bicycle.(F) A written description of California’s electric bicycle laws.(G) The internet website address for the electric bicycle safety and training program developed by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to Section 894 of the Streets and Highways Code.(H) A recommendation that persons under 16 years of age should not ride an electric bicycle at a speed greater than 15 miles per hour.(2) Sellers and distributors of electric bicycles shall also provide a disclosure at or before the point of sale that contains the following statement in 12-point:“IT IS AGAINST CALIFORNIA LAW FOR A PERSON TO TAMPER WITH, OR MODIFY, AN ELECTRIC BICYCLE SO AS TO CHANGE THE SPEED CAPABILITY OF THE DEVICE IN A MANNER THAT WOULD ALLOW THE DEVICE TO GO FASTER THAN PERMITTED BY LAW. MODIFYING THE DEVICE TO GO FASTER MAY RESULT IN REQUIREMENTS TO OPERATE THE DEVICE WITH AN M1 OR M2 LICENSE ENDORSEMENT, TO REGISTER THE DEVICE WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES, AND TO INSURE THE DEVICE AS A MOTORIZED BICYCLE OR MOTORCYCLE.”(c) A violation of this section is an infraction and is punishable as follows:(1) Upon a first conviction of a violation of this section, by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500). With respect to a first conviction, multiple sales of electric bicycles in violation of subdivision (a) or (b) shall constitute a single violation.(2) Upon a conviction of a violation under this section within three years of a prior conviction under this section, by a fine not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750).(3) Upon a conviction of a violation under this section within five years of two or more prior convictions under this section, by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).28172. (a) All class 2 electric bicycles, as defined in Section 312.5, manufactured, sold, or offered for sale on or after January 1, 2029, shall be required to be equipped with a speedometer.(b) All electric bicycles manufactured, sold, or offered for sale on or after January 1, 2029, shall be required to have the following equipment:(1) An integrated or detachable front lamp emitting a white light that, while the bicycle is in motion, illuminates the highway, sidewalk, or bikeway in front of the bicyclist and is visible from a distance of 300 feet in front, and from the sides, of the bicycle.(2) A rear lamp emitting a red light that, while the bicycle is in motion, illuminates the highway, sidewalk, or bikeway behind the bicyclist and is visible from a distance of 500 feet behind, and from the sides, of the bicycle.SEC. 6.SEC. 5. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.